Utah statutes.
36-20-6.   Findings -- Report -- Distribution of copies.

(1)  The committee may take action that includes:

(a)  an informal recommendation about a court rule or proposal for court rule; or

(b)  written findings of its review of each court rule or proposal for court rule and recommendations, if any, for legislative action or any Supreme Court or Judicial Council rulemaking action where significant issues have been identified.

(2)  If any findings are made under Subsection (1), the committee shall provide to the Supreme Court or the Judicial Council:

(a)  a copy of its findings; and

(b)  a request that the court or Judicial Council notify the committee of its response.

(3)  The committee may prepare a report that includes:

(a)  the findings and recommendations made by the committee based on the criteria in Section 36-20-4;

(b)  any action taken by the Supreme Court or Judicial Council in response to committee recommendations; and

(c)  any recommendations by the committee for legislation or Supreme Court or Judicial Council rulemaking action.

(4)  If a report is prepared, the committee shall provide a copy of the report to the presiding officers of both the House and the Senate, the Senate and House chairs of the Judiciary Interim Committee, Judiciary Standing Committees, the governor, the Executive Offices, Criminal Justice, and Legislature Appropriation Subcommittee, the Judicial Council, and the Supreme Court.



Amended by Chapter 36, 1996 General Session

